Utah statutes.
59-10-514.1.   Definitions -- Requirement to file returns using scan
technology or by electronic means -- Exceptions -- Waiver.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a) (i)  "electronic" means using a technology other than scan technology; and
(ii)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may make rules defining "technology";
(b) (i)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(b)(ii), "income tax return
preparer" means an individual that prepares for compensation a return required
to be filed by this chapter;
(ii)  notwithstanding Subsection (1)(b)(i), "income tax return preparer" does
not include an individual who:
(A)  performs only one or more of the following relating to a return required
to be filed by this chapter:
(I)  types the return;
(II)  reproduces the return; or
(III)  performs an action similar to Subsection (1)(b)(ii)(A)(I) or (II) as
determined by the commission by rule, made in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; or
(B)  prepares a return required to be filed by this chapter:
(I)  of the individual's employer or an officer or employee of the employer if
the individual is regularly and continuously employed by that employer;
(II)  of any person if that individual is a fiduciary for that person; or
(III)  for a taxpayer in response to a tax order issued to that taxpayer;
(c)  "prepare" means to prepare a substantial portion or more of a return
required to be filed by this chapter;
(d) (i)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(d)(ii), "qualifying return"
means a return required to be filed by this chapter for any taxable year that
begins on or after the January 1 described in Subsection (2)(c)(i); and
(ii)  notwithstanding Subsection (1)(d)(i), "qualifying return" does not
include:
(A)  an amended return; or
(B) (I)  a return filed for any taxable year that begins before the first day
of the current taxable year; and
(II)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may make rules defining "current taxable year"; and
(e) (i)  "scan technology" means technology that:
(A)  allows a return to be scanned; and
(B)  is approved by the commission; and
(ii)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule specify what types of technology constitute
scan technology.
(2) (a)  Subject to Subsections (2)(b) and (c) and except as provided in
Subsection (3), an income tax return preparer shall file all qualifying
returns using scan technology or by electronic means if the income tax return
preparer prepares in any calendar year beginning on or after January 1, 2005,
a total of 101 or more returns required to be filed by this chapter.
(b) (i)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(a), if two or more income tax return
preparers are affiliated with the same establishment, the total number of
returns required to be filed by this chapter that are prepared in a calendar
year beginning on or after January 1, 2005, by all of the income tax return
preparers that are affiliated with that establishment shall be included in
determining whether an income tax return preparer prepares in a calendar year
beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a total of 101 or more returns required
to be filed by this chapter.
(ii)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(b)(i), in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission may by rule
determine the circumstances under which two or more income tax return
preparers are affiliated with the same establishment.
(c)  If an income tax return preparer is required by this Subsection (2) to
file all qualifying returns using scan technology or by electronic means, the
income tax return preparer shall file those qualifying returns using scan
technology or by electronic means:
(i)  beginning on January 1 of the first calendar year immediately following
the day on which the income tax return preparer meets the requirements of this
Subsection (2); and
(ii)  for all calendar years after the calendar year described in Subsection
(2)(c)(i).
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), an income tax return preparer is not
required to file a qualifying return using scan technology or by electronic
means if:
(a)  a schedule required to be attached to the qualifying return cannot be
filed using scan technology or by electronic means;
(b)  the taxpayer for which the qualifying return is prepared requests in
writing that the income tax return preparer not file the qualifying return
using scan technology or by electronic means; or
(c)  subject to Subsection (4), the commission waives for one or more
qualifying returns filed by the income tax return preparer the requirement
imposed by this section to file the qualifying returns using scan technology
or by electronic means.
(4) (a)  For purposes of Subsection (3)(c), the commission may waive for one
or more qualifying returns filed by an income tax return preparer the
requirement imposed by this section to file the qualifying returns using scan
technology or by electronic means if the income tax return preparer
demonstrates to the commission that it would be an undue hardship to file the
qualifying returns using scan technology or by electronic means.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (4)(a) and in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission shall by rule
define the circumstances that constitute an undue hardship to file a
qualifying return using scan technology or by electronic means.
